Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-228
Game animals, defined.

Game animals means all antelope, cottontail rabbits, deer, elk, mountain sheep, squirrels, mountain lions, moose, and bears.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 38.